Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.015

Election method—Resolution for election—Contents of resolution.

When the legislative body of a charter code city or noncharter code city shall determine that the best interests and general welfare of such city would be served by the annexation of unincorporated territory contiguous to such city, such legislative body may, by resolution, call for an election to be held to submit to the voters of such territory the proposal for annexation. The resolution shall, subject to RCW 35.02.170, describe the boundaries of the area to be annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may be, and shall provide that said city will pay the cost of the annexation election. The resolution may require that there also be submitted to the electorate of the territory sought to be annexed a proposition that all property within the area annexed shall, upon annexation, be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the property of such annexing city is assessed and taxed to pay for all or any portion of the then-outstanding indebtedness of the city to which said area is annexed, which indebtedness has been approved by the voters, contracted for, or incurred prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation. Whenever such city has prepared and filed a proposed zoning regulation for the area to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340, the resolution initiating the election may also provide for the simultaneous adoption of the proposed zoning regulation upon approval of annexation by the electorate of the area to be annexed. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the legislative authority of the county in which said territory is located. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the boundary review board as provided for in chapter 36.93 RCW or the county annexation review board established by RCW 35A.14.200, unless such annexation proposal is within the provisions of RCW 35A.14.220.

[ 1986 c 234 s 29; 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 10; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.015.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 124: "If any provision of this 1979 act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 11.]

Legislative finding, intent—1975 1st ex.s. c 220: See note following RCW 35.02.170.